New.aff
PFX P 0 bwatu .
PFX P 0 obwan [^lmn]
PFX P l obwand l.[^mn]
PFX P l obwann l.[mn]
PFX P w obwamp [w]
PFX P 0 obwamu .
PFX P 0 obwaba .
PFX P 0 obwagu .
PFX P 0 obwagi .
PFX P 0 obwazi .
PFX P 0 obwaki .
PFX P 0 obwabi .
PFX P 0 obwali .
PFX P 0 obwaga .
PFX P 0 obwaka .
PFX P 0 obwabu .
PFX P 0 obwalu .
PFX P 0 obwaku .
PFX P 0 obwatu .
PFX P 0 lwan [^lmn]
PFX P l lwand l.[^mn]
PFX P l lwann l.[mn]
PFX P w lwamp [w]
PFX P 0 lwamu .
PFX P 0 lwaba .
PFX P 0 lwagu .
PFX P 0 lwagi .
PFX P 0 lwazi .
PFX P 0 lwaki .
PFX P 0 lwabi .
PFX P 0 lwali .
PFX P 0 lwaga .
PFX P 0 lwaka .
PFX P 0 lwabu .
PFX P 0 lwalu .
PFX P 0 lwaku .
PFX P 0 lwatu .
PFX P 0 olwan [^lmn]
PFX P l olwand l.[^mn]
PFX P l olwann l.[mn]
PFX P w olwamp [w]
PFX P 0 olwamu .
PFX P 0 olwaba .
PFX P 0 olwagu .
PFX P 0 olwagi .
PFX P 0 olwazi .
PFX P 0 olwaki .
PFX P 0 olwabi .
PFX P 0 olwali .
PFX P 0 olwaga .
PFX P 0 olwaka .
PFX P 0 olwabu .
PFX P 0 olwalu .
PFX P 0 olwaku .
PFX P 0 olwatu .
PFX P 0 kwaan [^lmn]
PFX P l kwaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l kwaann l.[mn]
PFX P w kwaamp [w]
PFX P 0 kwaamu .
PFX P 0 kwaaba .
PFX P 0 kwaagu .
PFX P 0 kwaagi .
PFX P 0 kwaazi .
PFX P 0 kwaaki .
PFX P 0 kwaabi .
PFX P 0 kwaali .
PFX P 0 kwaaga .
PFX P 0 kwaaka .
PFX P 0 kwaabu .
PFX P 0 kwaalu .
PFX P 0 kwaaku .
PFX P 0 kwaatu .
PFX P 0 okwaan [^lmn]
PFX P l okwaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l okwaann l.[mn]
PFX P w okwaamp [w]
PFX P 0 okwaamu .
PFX P 0 okwaaba .
PFX P 0 okwaagu .
PFX P 0 okwaagi .
PFX P 0 okwaazi .
PFX P 0 okwaaki .
PFX P 0 okwaabi .
PFX P 0 okwaali .
PFX P 0 okwaaga .
PFX P 0 okwaaka .
PFX P 0 okwaabu .
PFX P 0 okwaalu .
PFX P 0 okwaaku .
PFX P 0 okwaatu .
PFX P 0 twaan [^lmn]
PFX P l twaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l twaann l.[mn]
PFX P w twaamp [w]
PFX P 0 twaamu .
PFX P 0 twaaba .
PFX P 0 twaagu .
PFX P 0 twaagi .
PFX P 0 twaazi .
PFX P 0 twaaki .
PFX P 0 twaabi .
PFX P 0 twaali .
PFX P 0 twaaga .
PFX P 0 twaaka .
PFX P 0 twaabu .
PFX P 0 twaalu .
PFX P 0 twaaku .
PFX P 0 twaatu .
PFX P 0 otwaan [^lmn]
PFX P l otwaand l.[^mn]
PFX P l otwaann l.[mn]
PFX P w otwaamp [w]
PFX P 0 otwaamu .
PFX P 0 otwaaba .
PFX P 0 otwaagu .
PFX P 0 otwaagi .
PFX P 0 otwaazi .
PFX P 0 otwaaki .
PFX P 0 otwaabi .
PFX P 0 otwaali .
PFX P 0 otwaaga .
PFX P 0 otwaaka .
PFX P 0 otwaabu .
PFX P 0 otwaalu .
PFX P 0 otwaaku .
PFX P 0 otwaatu .

# Cross product of future tense subject markers (K) and object markers (F)
# Generated via script to handle chaining
